config/global.aff
SET UTF-8

FLAG num

SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 ය .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 ේ .
SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 0 යක් .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 0 යෙන් .
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 යන් .
SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 0 ෙ .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 යන්ට .
SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 0 ැයි .
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 ා .
SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24 0 ු .
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 0 ේය [.
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 ෙමු .
SFX 1225 Y 1
SFX 1225 ණ ම් ණ
SFX 1680 Y 1
SFX 1680 ණ නු ණ
SFX 3899 Y 1
SFX 3899 ණ නා ණ
